Missouri, session 2026, SB903.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 569.086, RSMo, is repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
569.086, 569.117, and 569.119, to read as follows:
569.086. 1. As used in this section, "critical
infrastructure facility" means any of the following
facilities that are under construction or operational: a
petroleum or alumina refinery; critical electric
infrastructure, as defined in 18 CFR [Section 118.113(c)(3)]
Section 388.113(c)(3) including, but not limited to, an
electrical power generating facility, substation, switching
station, electrical control center, or electric power lines
and associated equipment infrastructure; a chemical,
polymer, or rubber manufacturing facility; a water intake
structure, water storage facility, water treatment facility,
wastewater treatment plant, wastewater pumping facility, or
pump station; a natural gas compressor station; a liquid
natural gas terminal or storage facility; a
telecommunications central switching office; wireline or
wireless telecommunications networks, infrastructure, or
facilities, including cell towers, telephone poles and
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SS SCS SB 903 2
lines, including fiber optic lines; a port, railroad
switching yard, railroad tracks, trucking terminal, or other
freight transportation facility; a gas processing plant,
including a plant used in the processing, treatment, or
fractionation of natural gas or natural gas liquids; a
transmission facility used by a federally licensed radio or
television station; a steelmaking facility that uses an
electric arc furnace to make steel; a facility identified
and regulated by the United States Department of Homeland
Security Chemical Facility Anti-Terrorism Standards (CFATS)
program; a dam that is regulated by the state or federal
government; a natural gas distribution utility facility
including, but not limited to, natural gas distribution and
transmission mains and services, pipeline interconnections,
a city gate or town border station, metering station,
aboveground piping, a regulator station, and a natural gas
storage facility; a crude oil or refined products storage
and distribution facility including, but not limited to,
valve sites, pipeline interconnection, pump station,
metering station, below or aboveground pipeline or piping
and truck loading or offloading facility, a grain mill or
processing facility; [a] networks and facilities used in the
generation, transmission, or distribution [system] of
broadband internet access; or any aboveground portion of an
oil, gas, hazardous liquid or chemical pipeline, tank,
railroad facility, or other storage facility that is
enclosed by a fence, other physical barrier, or is clearly
marked with signs prohibiting trespassing, that are
obviously designed to exclude intruders.
2. A person commits the offense of trespass on a
critical infrastructure facility if he or she purposely
trespasses or enters property containing a critical

SS SCS SB 903 3
infrastructure facility without the permission of the owner
of the property or lawful occupant thereof. The offense of
trespass on a critical infrastructure facility is a class B
misdemeanor. [If it is determined that the intent of the
trespasser is to damage, destroy, or tamper with equipment,
or impede or inhibit operations of the facility, the person
shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
3. A person commits the offense of damage of a
critical infrastructure if he or she purposely damages,
destroys, or tampers with equipment in a critical
infrastructure facility. The offense of damage of a
critical infrastructure facility is a class D felony.
4.] 3. This section shall not apply to conduct
protected under the Constitution of the United States, the
Constitution of [the state of] Missouri, or a state or
federal law or rule.
569.117. 1. A person commits the offense of damage of
a critical infrastructure facility, as defined in section
569.086, if he or she:
(1) Purposely damages, destroys, or tampers with
equipment in a critical infrastructure facility; or
(2) Recklessly damages, destroys, or tampers with a
critical infrastructure facility, or removes any component
of the critical infrastructure facility, excluding equipment.
2. Except as provided under subsection 3 of this
section, the offense of damage of a critical infrastructure
facility under:
(1) Subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section is
a class D felony; or
(2) Subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section is
a:

SS SCS SB 903 4
(a) Class A misdemeanor if the damage is under seven
hundred fifty dollars;
(b) Class E felony if the damage is seven hundred
fifty dollars or more but less than twenty-five thousand
dollars; or
(c) Class D felony if the damage is twenty-five
thousand dollars or more.
3. If the damage to a critical infrastructure facility
causes interruption, impairment, or degradation of service,
the offense of damage of a critical infrastructure facility
shall be a class C felony regardless of value.
4. The value of damages under this section shall be
determined under the provisions of section 570.020.
5. (1) Any person who commits a violation under this
section shall be required to make restitution and perform
community service as provided in this subsection.
(2) Restitution shall be made under the provisions of
section 559.105.
(3) Community service shall be imposed as follows:
(a) One hundred hours for the first offense;
(b) Two hundred hours for the second offense; or
(c) Up to three hundred hours for the third or any
subsequent offense.
569.119. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or
telecommunications material", any insulated or noninsulated
copper, brass, aluminum, fiber-optic, or telecommunications
wire, cable, pipe, tubing, power inverter, bus bar,
broadband cable, fiber-optic line, or any material
containing copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, glass, or metal
components that is commonly used in construction, electrical

SS SCS SB 903 5
systems, telecommunications networks, broadband
infrastructure, utilities, or related commercial or
industrial applications;
(2) "Critical infrastructure facility", the same
meaning as defined under section 569.086.
2. A person commits the offense of unauthorized
possession of certain copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or
telecommunications material if the person:
(1) Knowingly possesses copper, brass, aluminum,
fiber, or telecommunications material; and
(2) Is not a person authorized to possess such
material as provided under subsection 3 of this section.
3. Subject to subsection 4 of this section, the
following persons are authorized to possess copper, brass,
aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications material:
(1) The owner of the material;
(2) A public utility, rural electric cooperative,
municipal utility, or common carrier;
(3) A telecommunications provider, internet service
provider, cable service provider, or video service provider;
(4) A manufacturing, industrial, commercial, retail,
or similar business that sells or uses such material in the
ordinary course of business;
(5) A carrier-for-hire acting in the course and scope
of the carrier's business and possessing appropriate
documentation, including a bill of lading or contract
verifying transport information;
(6) A scrap metal or metal recycling dealer under
chapter 407 and acting within the ordinary course of
business;

SS SCS SB 903 6
(7) A person acting in the ordinary course of lawful
construction, remodeling, demolition, or salvage work who
lawfully acquires the material through such activities; or
(8) Any agent, employee, subcontractor, or
representative of a person described in subdivisions (1) to
(7) of this subsection who is acting within the course and
scope of such authority.
4. The authorization provided under subsection 3 of
this section does not apply to a person who knows that the
copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications
material was unlawfully obtained.
5. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, the offense of unauthorized possession of
certain copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or
telecommunications material is a class E felony.
(2) The offense of unauthorized possession of certain
copper, brass, aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications
material is a class D felony if it is shown at trial that:
(a) The material was unlawfully obtained from a
critical infrastructure facility;
(b) The person has a prior conviction for any offense
involving theft, property damage, tampering, receiving
stolen property, or unauthorized possession of copper,
brass, aluminum, fiber, or telecommunications material; or
(c) The person conspired with or acted in concert with
another to commit theft, property damage, tampering, or
receiving stolen property involving such material.
6. If conduct constituting an offense under this
section also constitutes an offense under any other
provision of law, the person may be prosecuted under either

SS SCS SB 903 7
or both provisions subject to the provisions of section
556.041.
✓